California statutes. Public Utilities Code
Bonds authorized by this chapter shall mature serially in amounts to be fixed by the board; except that payment shall begin not later than 10 years from the date thereof and shall be completed in not more than 50 years from that date.

The board may divide any issue of bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter into two or more series, and may fix different dates of issuance and different maturity dates for the bonds of each series. The bonds of each series shall mature serially in amounts to be fixed by the board, and the board shall fix a date not more than 10 years from the date of issuance of each series for the earliest
 maturity of such series, and shall fix a date not more than 50 years from the date of issuance of each series for the final maturity of such series.

Pending the actual issuance or delivery of bonds, a district may issue temporary or interim bonds, certificates, or receipts, of any denomination whatsoever, with or without coupon, and in such form as may be prescribed by the board, to be exchanged for definite bonds when ready for delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40241.

The bonds shall be issued in such denominations as the board determines, except that no bonds shall be issued of a denomination less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and shall be payable on the day and at the place or places fixed in the bond, and with interest at the rate specified therein, payable semiannually, except that interest for the first year after the date of the bonds may be made payable at the end of that year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

40242.

The board may at any time prior to the issuance and sale of any bonds provide for the call and redemption of any or all of the bonds on any interest payment date prior to their fixed maturity at not exceeding the par value and accrued interest plus a premium of not exceeding 5 percent upon the principal amount of the bonds, in which event the call price fixed by the board shall be set forth on the face of the bond. Notice of such redemption shall be published. If there is no newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the district, then the publication shall be made in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the county in which
 the district or any part thereof is situated. The first publication shall be at least 30 days prior to the date fixed for the redemption. After the date fixed for such redemption interest on the bonds thereafter shall cease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40243.

The bonds shall be signed by the chairman of the board or by such officer of the district as the board shall by resolution authorize and designate for that purpose. They shall also be signed by the treasurer, and be countersigned by the auditor. The coupons of the bonds shall be numbered consecutively and be signed by the treasurer. All signatures and countersignatures, except one of the signatures or countersignatures on the bonds, may be printed, lithographed or engraved. If any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be such officer before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, the signature or countersignature is
 nevertheless valid and sufficient for all purposes as if he had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Issue and Sale [40245. - 40246.]

40245.

The bonds may be issued and sold for not less than their par value, but otherwise as the board determines. Before selling any bonds, or any part thereof, the board shall give notice inviting sealed bids in such manner as the board may prescribe. If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder. If no bids are received, or if the board determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, the board may reject all bids received, if any, and either again give notice inviting bids or sell the bonds at private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40246.

All premiums and accrued interest received on the sale of bonds shall be placed in the fund to be used for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds. The remainder of the proceeds of the bonds shall be placed in the district treasury to the credit of the proper fund, and shall be used exclusively for the objects or purposes for which the bonds were voted; provided that when such objects and purposes have been accomplished any moneys remaining shall be transferred to the fund to be used for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds, and that when all principal of and interest on the bonds shall have been paid, any balance of money then remaining
 shall be transferred to the general fund of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Status as Investments [40260. - 40261.]

40260.

All bonds including refunding bonds issued by a district are legal investments for all trust funds and for the funds of all insurance companies, banks, both commercial and savings, and trust companies, and for the State School Fund and for all sinking funds under the control of the State Treasurer. Whenever any money or funds may by law be invested in or loaned upon the security of bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, or school districts, in the state, such money or funds may be invested in or loaned upon the security of the bonds of the district; and whenever bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, or school districts by law may be used as security for
 the faithful performance or execution of any court or private trust or of any other act, bonds of the district may be so used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40261.

All bonds of the district, to the same extent as bonds of any other municipality, are legal for use by any state or national bank or banks in the state as security for the deposit of funds of the state or of any county, city and county, city, municipality or other public or municipal corporation within the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Validation [40263. - 40263.]

40263.

An action to determine the validity of bonds, including refunding bonds, may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Revenue Bonds [40265. - 40266.]

40265.

As an alternative procedure for the raising of funds, the district may issue bonds, payable from revenues of any facility or enterprise to be acquired or constructed by the district, in the manner provided by the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), all of the provisions of which are applicable to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40266.

The district is a local agency within the meaning of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code). The term “enterprise” as used in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 shall, for all purposes of this part, include transit facilities and any and all parts thereof and all additions, extensions and improvements thereto and all other facilities authorized to be acquired, constructed or completed by the district. A district may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, for any one or more facilities or enterprises authorized to be acquired, constructed, or completed by a district or,
 in the alternative, may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, for the acquisition, construction and completion of any one of such facilities. Nothing in this article shall prevent the district from availing itself of, or making use of, any procedure provided in this part for the issuance of bonds of any type or character for any of the facilities or works authorized hereunder, and all proceedings may be carried on simultaneously or, in the alternative, as the directors may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Taxation [40300. - 40336.]



  ARTICLE 1. Property Taxation [40300. - 40310.]

40300.

The district may levy and collect, or cause to be collected, taxes for any lawful purpose subject to a maximum limit of five cents ($0.05) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation within the district exclusive of any tax levied to meet the bonded indebtedness of the district and the interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

40301.

If, in the opinion of the board, the transit operation revenues will not be sufficient for any and all lawful purposes, the board shall levy a tax for such purpose or purposes and fix the amount of money necessary to be raised therefor by taxation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

40302.

The board shall, as part of the general tax levy as set forth in Section 40300 levy and collect annually until the district’s bonds are paid, or until there is a sum in the treasury of the district set apart for that purpose to meet all sums coming due for principal and interest on the bonds as they become due, a tax sufficient to pay the annual interest on the bonds, and such part of the principal thereof, as becomes due before the proceeds of a tax levied at the next general tax levy will be available. If the maturity of the indebtedness created by the issue of bonds begins more than one year after the date of the issuance thereof, the tax shall be levied and collected
 annually at the time and in the manner stated above, in an amount sufficient to pay the interest on the indebtedness as it falls due and to constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the principal on or before maturity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

40303.

The board may provide for the assessment, levy, and collection of taxes by the district, including the sale of property to the district for delinquent taxes, with penalties, interest, and cost.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

40304.

The board shall avail itself of the assessments made by the assessor of the county and of the assessments made by the State Board of Equalization for the county, and shall take such assessments as the basis for district taxation and have its taxes collected by the tax collector of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

40305.

In such case, the county auditor shall, on or before the third Monday in August of each year, transmit to the board a statement, in writing, showing the total value of all property within the district, ascertained from the assessments referred to in Section 40304 as equalized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

40306.

The board shall, on or before the first day of September, fix the rate of taxes, designating the number of cents upon each one hundred dollars ($100) using as a basis the value of property transmitted to the board by the county auditor, which rate of taxation shall be sufficient to raise the amount previously fixed by the board. These acts by the board shall constitute a valid assessment of the property and a valid levy of the taxes so fixed, but the rate of taxation shall not exceed the limit imposed by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

40307.

The board shall immediately, after fixing the rate of taxes as provided in Section 40306, transmit to the county auditor of the county a statement of the rate of taxes fixed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

40308.

The district’s taxes so levied shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes. When collected, the net amount, ascertained as provided in this article, shall be paid to the treasurer of the district under the general requirements and penalties provided by law for the settlement of other taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

40309.

Whenever any real property has been sold for taxes and has been redeemed, the money paid for redemption shall be apportioned and paid to the district by the county treasurer in the proportion which the tax due to the district bears to the total tax for which the property was sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

40310.

All taxes levied under this article are a lien on the property on which they are levied. The enforcement of the collection of such taxes shall be in the same manner and by the same means provided by law for the enforcement of liens for county taxes, all the provisions of law relating to the enforcement of the latter being made a part of this article so far as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Transactions and Use Taxes and Revenue Bonds [40330. - 40336.]

40330.

Transactions and use taxes (to be designated in the ballot proposition set forth in Section 40334 as a “sales tax”) may be imposed by the board in accordance with the provisions of Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, except that the rate shall be as set forth in Section 40335.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

40331.

Any transactions and use taxes ordinance adopted pursuant to this article shall be operative on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing more than 120 days after the approval of such ordinance by the electors as provided in this article.

Prior to the operative date of the ordinance, the district shall contract with the State Board of Equalization to perform all functions incident to the administration and operation of the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

40332.

(a) The revenues from the taxes imposed pursuant to this article may be used for any lawful purpose of the district.

(b) During the first three years the taxes are imposed pursuant to this article, 25 percent of the revenues generated from such taxes shall be allocated by the district to Orange County and the cities therein in the proportion that the population of the county or city, as the case may be, bears to the total population of the district. For purposes of this subdivision, the population of the county shall be the population of the unincorporated territory of the county.

(c) The revenues allocated pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be used by the county and the cities to finance public transit services, which shall be coordinated with the public transit services operated by the district. The county or any city may also use the revenues to finance public transit services operated by the district.

(d) At the end of four years, as measured from the initial imposition of the taxes pursuant to this article, any of the revenues allocated pursuant to subdivision (b) which has not been expended for public transit services shall revert to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

40333.

The taxes authorized by this article shall not be imposed unless the board shall have authorized it by ordinance adopted by a vote of two-thirds of all members of the board and the ordinance shall be approved by two-thirds of the votes cast by the qualified electors of the district voting on the proposition at an election called for that purpose. The board, in the ordinance, shall state the nature of the tax to be imposed, shall provide the tax rate or rates or the maximum tax rate or rates, and shall specify the purposes for which the revenue derived from the tax will be used.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 345, Sec. 4.   (AB 2752)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

40334.

The actual wording of the proposition on any short form of ballot card, label, or other device, regardless of the system of voting used, shall read as follows:TRANSITAuthorizes the Orange County Transit District to impose a ____ percent sales tax for transit purposes.YesNoThe proposition shall set forth the actual percent of the transaction and use taxes upon which the electors are voting.

The sample ballot to be mailed to the voters, under Section 13303 of the Elections Code, shall be the full proposition as set forth in the ordinance adopted pursuant to Section 40333.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 200.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

40335.

The board is authorized to impose a maximum tax rate of 1 percent under this article and the board may state the maximum tax rate in terms of not to exceed 1 percent, or any lesser percentage thereof. The district shall not levy the tax at a rate other than 1, 34, 12, or 14 percent, unless specifically authorized by the Legislature. The board, in the ordinance, may provide
 for limitations upon the time when the tax shall be in effect, or the board may provide that the tax shall be in effect until repealed. Any tax rate or maximum tax rate adopted pursuant to this article, unless otherwise prohibited, may be increased when authorized by the board by ordinance adopted in the manner and by the vote stated in Section 40333 and approved by a majority of the votes cast by the qualified electors of the district voting at an election called for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

40336.

The district is hereby authorized to issue revenue bonds, payable, in whole or in part, from revenues made available under this article. Such revenues are hereby declared to be revenues of the enterprise for all purposes of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code), and the restrictions therein provided against the securing of bonds by the taxing power or the proceeds of taxation shall not apply. The district shall be deemed a “local agency” and the planning, acquiring, constructing, operating, or maintaining of the district’s transit facilities, or any part thereof, shall be deemed an
 “enterprise” within the meaning of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941. The provisions of such law not inconsistent with any of the provisions of this article are hereby made applicable to the district, except that no election shall be required for the issuance of bonds under such law which are secured, in whole or in part, by the revenues of the tax imposed pursuant to this article. The resolution or indenture authorizing the issuance of any revenue bonds secured, in whole or in part, by the revenues of the tax imposed pursuant to this article shall provide that use of such revenues by the district to redeem such bonds shall be continued in effect until such bonds are fully paid or provision has been made for their payment in full.

The district may borrow money in anticipation of the revenues made available under this article and may, from time to time, issue negotiable notes for that purpose.

In addition to pledging revenues for
 the payment of any revenue bonds, the district may pledge for the payment of such bonds all other income or receipts of the district which are not required by law to be used for other purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Dissolution [40500. - 40507.]

40500.

The board may call an election any time for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the district the question of whether the district will be dissolved. Upon the filing with the clerk of the district of a petition signed by voters within the district equal in number to at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the total vote cast within the district at the last general statewide election asking that the question of dissolution of the district be submitted to the voters of the district, the board shall call such an election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40501.

The election for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the district the question of whether or not the district shall be dissolved shall be held on the next established election date not less than 74 days next succeeding the date on which the petition is filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1146.)
-------------------------------------------

40502.

Notice of any election for dissolution, whether called because of the filing of a petition or ordered by the board without petition, shall be published. The date fixed for the election shall not be less than 30 days from the date of the first publication of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40503.

The ballots for the election shall contain substantially the instructions required to be printed on ballots for use at general state and county elections and in addition the following: Shall the Orange County Transit District be dissolved?YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40504.

The board shall canvass the vote. If a majority of the votes favor dissolution, the board shall by resolution dissolve the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40505.

The board shall file a certified copy of the resolution with the Secretary of State and for record in the office of the county recorder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40506.

Upon dissolution the right, title, and interest to property owned or controlled by the district situated within the limits of any city vests absolutely in the city. If such property is situated outside the limits of a city, it vests in the county in which it is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40507.

The board of supervisors is, ex officio, the governing body of the dissolved district. It may levy taxes and assessments and perform other acts necessary to wind up the district affairs and to raise money for the payment of outstanding indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Consolidation with Other Districts [40600. - 40617.]

40600.

The district may be consolidated with the Southern California Rapid Transit District organized and operating pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 30000) of this division, in the manner provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40601.

Whenever the board finds and determines that:

(a) The Southern California Rapid Transit District is willing to annex the territory comprising the district;

(b) The annexing district has adequate facilities for and is able to supply transit service to the district in a manner equal to or superior to that presently rendered by the district;

(c) Annexation will not result in assumption of financial obligations by the taxpayers of the district disproportionate to the services which they
 will receive; the board shall thereafter negotiate an agreement with the annexing district specifying the terms and conditions of annexation and such other matters as are necessary and incidental thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40602.

The board shall thereafter, by resolution setting forth the terms and conditions of the proposed contract at length, declare its intention to cause the agreement to be approved and effect consolidation of the district with the Southern California Rapid Transit District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40603.

The resolution, together with a notice fixing the time and place for hearing thereon, shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district. The time fixed for hearing shall not be less than 30 nor more than 60 days from the date of publication of such notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40604.

At the hearing any interested person may file with the board written objections to the approval of the terms and conditions of the proposed contract or the consolidation, or both the proposed contract and the consolidation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40605.

Upon the hearing, the board shall determine whether or not the terms and conditions of the contract will be approved and the consolidation effected, and shall hear and determine all objections thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40606.

Any hearing on the agreement and consolidation may be adjourned from time to time by the board, not exceeding 30 days in all, without further notice other than an order entered upon the minutes of the meeting fixing the time and place of adjournment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40607.

If no protests are filed, or if the protests filed are overruled and denied by the board, the board shall thereupon by resolution finally approve the terms and conditions of the agreement and proceed with the consolidation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40608.

At any time after the board of directors of the district has finally approved the agreement the Board of Supervisors of Orange County shall cause an election to be held in the district to determine whether the Orange County Transit District will be consolidated with the Southern California Rapid Transit District upon the terms and conditions stated in the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40609.

Notice of election shall be published once a week for two successive weeks (two publications) in a newspaper of general circulation published within the district, and shall either state that a copy of the consolidation agreement is on file in the office of the Clerk of Orange County, and open to the inspection of all persons interested, or set forth the terms and conditions of the consolidation agreement at length, in the discretion of the board of supervisors calling the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40610.

The ballots for the election shall contain substantially the instructions required to be printed on ballots for use at general state and county elections and in addition shall set forth the proposition of consolidation substantially as follows: Shall the Orange County Transit District be consolidated with the Southern California Rapid Transit District in accordance with and subject to all the terms and
 conditions of a consolidation agreement dated ____now on file in the office of the Clerk of Orange County?YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40611.

If upon a canvass of the election it is found that a majority of all votes cast on the proposition at the election were cast in favor of the consolidation, the proposition and all of the terms and conditions of the consolidation agreement shall be deemed carried and approved by the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40612.

If the proposition fails to carry, the result shall be entered upon the minutes of the Board of Supervisors of Orange County.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40613.

If the proposition receives the vote of the requisite majority of voters, the Board of Supervisors of Orange County shall enter in its minutes an order declaring the result of the election and shall thereupon cause the consolidation agreement to be executed by its duly authorized officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40614.

Upon receipt by the Southern California Rapid Transit District of a copy of the consolidation agreement properly executed by the district and Orange County the board of directors of the Southern California Rapid Transit District shall pass a resolution declaring the Orange County Transit District consolidated with the Southern California Rapid Transit District, and shall cause a certified copy of the resolution to be filed with the Secretary of State. From and after the date of filing of the resolution with the Secretary of State the consolidation of the Orange County Transit District with the Southern California Rapid Transit District is complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40615.

From and after the date of consolidation the board of directors of the Southern California Rapid Transit District shall levy upon all of the property in the former Orange County Transit District such taxes, tolls, or charges as are necessary to provide funds for the payment of the indebtedness assumed by the former district or otherwise necessary to comply with the terms and conditions of the consolidation agreement, all in addition to the general district taxes authorized elsewhere in Part 3 (commencing with Section 30000) of this division to be levied and collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40616.

The validity of any consolidating proceedings shall not be contested in any action unless the action is brought within three (3) months after the completion of the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40617.

Upon the completion of such consolidation procedure, the Orange County Transit District shall be deemed to be dissolved. Thereafter, all property and assets of the district which are not subject to the negotiated contract pertaining to consolidation shall be distributed to the County of Orange.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. SAN JOAQUIN REGIONAL TRANSIT DISTRICT [50000. - 50507.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [50000. - 50014.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [50000. - 50007.]

50000.

This part shall be known and cited as the “San Joaquin Regional Transit District Act.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 704, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

50001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this article govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50002.

“District” means the San Joaquin Regional Transit District formed under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 704, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

50003.

“Board” means the board of directors of this district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50004.

“Voter” means any elector who is registered under the Elections Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50005.

“Transit” means the transportation of passengers and their incidental baggage by any means.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50006.

“Transit works” or “transit facilities” means all real and personal property, equipment, rights, or interests owned or to be acquired by the district for transit service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50007.

For purposes of this part, “Stockton Metropolitan Area” means that area which was included within the boundaries of the Stockton Metropolitan Transit District, immediately prior to that district being expanded to include all of San Joaquin County.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 704, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [50010. - 50014.]

50010.

It is necessary that a transit district be established in the Stockton metropolitan area which includes the City of Stockton and adjacent territory situated in San Joaquin County in order to meet the transit problem of the area. The problem is unique in that presently there are several existing transportation facilities serving various parts of the area but independently operated, without interchange of transportation services, and without possibility of merger. The geographic location of the city to the area requiring transportation services makes it necessary to develop a single transit system to protect the public interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50011.

The San Joaquin Regional Transit District may be created as provided in this part and when so created may exercise the powers herein granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 704, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

50012.

Except as otherwise provided in this part elections shall be held and conducted and the result ascertained, determined, and declared in, all respects as nearly as practicable in conformity with the general election laws of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50013.

Except as otherwise provided in this part all ordinances and notices which are required to be published shall be published within the district pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50014.

Whenever the signature of any officer or employee of a district or of any member of the retirement board or of any officer or employee of the retirement system is authorized or required under the provisions of this part, except in the single instance provided in Section 50243, the signature may be made by the use of a plate bearing facsimiles of such signatures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Formation of District [50020. - 50055.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [50020. - 50021.]

50020.

The City of Stockton, together with unincorporated territory, may organize and incorporate as the Stockton Metropolitan Transit District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50021.

The request for the formation of the Stockton Metropolitan Transit District may be made by resolution or by petition as set out in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Request by Resolution [50025. - 50027.]

50025.

The legislative body of the City of Stockton may pass a resolution declaring that in its opinion public interest or necessity demands the creation and maintenance of the Stockton Metropolitan Transit District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50026.

The resolution may state the transit facilities proposed to be first acquired, but failure to acquire such transit facilities shall not affect the validity of the district. The resolution shall set forth and describe the boundaries of the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50027.

Certified copies of the resolution shall be presented to the Board of Supervisors of San Joaquin County requesting the board of supervisors to call an election without delay for determining whether the district will be created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Request by Petition [50030. - 50033.]

50030.

Instead of a resolution, a petition may be presented to the board of supervisors signed by voters within the proposed district equal in number to at least 25 percent of the total vote cast at the last general election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50031.

The petition shall contain substantially the same declarations and statements required to be contained in the resolution presented to the board of supervisors under this chapter, including the description of the boundaries, and declare that, in the opinion of the petitioners, public interest or necessity demands the creation and maintenance of the metropolitan transit district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50032.

The petition may be on separate papers, but each paper shall contain the affidavit of the person who circulated it certifying that each name signed thereto is a true signature of the person whose name it purports to be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50033.

The County Elections Official of the County of San Joaquin shall compare the signatures to the petition with the affidavits of registration and certify to their sufficiency or insufficiency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 107.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Election [50035. - 50045.]

50035.

Upon receipt of certified copies of the resolution or of a sufficient petition, the board of supervisors shall hold a hearing on the question of forming a Stockton Metropolitan Transit District. All interested persons shall be given an opportunity to express their views at the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50036.

The board of supervisors shall have the power to exclude unincorporated areas which, in the board’s determination, would not receive reasonable benefit from inclusion in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50037.

At the conclusion of the hearing, if the board of supervisors approves the resolution or petition as originally presented or in modified form, it shall by resolution entered upon its minutes:

(a) Fix and describe the exterior boundaries of the proposed district as determined by the board of supervisors.

(b) Fix the date on which an election will be held in the proposed district and the hours during which the polls will be open.

(c) State the purpose for which the election is
 held.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50038.
